Oklahoma, session 2025, SB644.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 4200.10, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4200.10. A. The Massage Therapy Practice Act shall
supersede all ordinances or regulations regulating massage
therapists in any city, county, or political subdivision of this
state.
B. This section shall not affect the regulations of a city,
county, or a political subdivision of this state relating to zoning
requirements or occupational license fees pertaining to health care
professions.
C. This section shall not affect the regulations of a city,
county, or a political subdivision of this state relating to zoning

ENGR. S. B. NO. 644 Page 1

or l icensing requirements for business locations offering massage
therapy.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the Senate the 25th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives












ENGR. S. B. NO. 644 Page 2